Utah statutes.
78B-14-210 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Application to nonresident subject to personal jurisdiction.

A tribunal of this state exercising personal jurisdiction over a nonresident in a proceeding under this chapter, under other law of this state relating to a support order, or recognizing a support order of a foreign country or political subdivision on the basis of comity may receive evidence from another state pursuant to Section 78B-14-316, communicate with a tribunal of another state pursuant to Section 78B-14-317, and obtain discovery through a tribunal of another state pursuant to Section 78B-14-318.  In all other respects, Parts 3 through 7 do not apply and the tribunal shall apply the procedural and substantive law of this state.

